Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-102 Share of spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary. The intestate share of a decedent's surviving spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary is:

(1) The entire intestate estate if:

(A) No descendant or parent of the decedent
survives the decedent; or

(B) All of the decedent's surviving
descendants are also descendants of the surviving spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary and there is no other descendant of the surviving spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary who survives the decedent;

(2) The first $200,000, plus three-fourths of any
balance of the intestate estate, if no descendant of the decedent survives the
decedent, but a parent of the decedent survives the decedent;

(3) The first $150,000, plus one-half of any balance
of the intestate estate, if all of the decedent's surviving descendants are
also descendants of the surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary and the
surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary has one or more surviving
descendants who are not descendants of the decedent; or

(4) The first $100,000, plus one-half of any balance
of the intestate estate, if one or more of the decedent's surviving descendants
are not descendants of the surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary. [L 1996,
c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next